dictsource/sk_rules
.group v
        v        v
     o) v (_     u

     _) vy (@P2  'vi

.group w
        w        v

.group x
        x        ks

.group y
        y        i

.group ý
        ý        i:

.group z
        z        z
        z (_     s
        z (_G    z

.group ž
        ž        Z
        ž (_     S
        ž (_G    Z

.group
        ě        e
        ů        u:            // czech
        $        dola:R
        %        peRtsento
    D_) %        peRtsent
